District of Columbia statutes.
20-341

Requirements.

(a)

A foreign personal representative of a nondomiciliary shall not be required to obtain letters in the District of Columbia for any purpose.

(b)

A foreign personal representative administering an estate which has property located in the District of Columbia shall file with the Register a copy of the appointment as personal representative and a copy of the decedent’s will, if any, authenticated pursuant to 28 U.S.C. sec. 1738.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-341.
This section is referenced in § 20-302.